Idaho, session 2025, S1173.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Juvenile Corrections the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $675,100 $675,100
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund 0 $232,500 232,500
TOTAL $675,100 $232,500 $907,600
II. COMMUNITY, OPERATIONS, AND PROGRAM SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $300,000 $300,000
III. INSTITUTIONS:
FROM:
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund $474,100 $51,000 $525,100
GRAND TOTAL $1,149,200 $283,500 $300,000 $1,732,700


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other appropriation made by law, the ap-
propriation to the Department of Juvenile Corrections in the Administration
Program is hereby reduced by $675,100 for personnel costs from the General
Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Juvenile Corrections is hereby reduced by seven (7.00)
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.